Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-124.01
District; budget; public inspection.

An irrigation district organized under sections 46-101 to 46-128 shall maintain a current copy of its annual budget at its principal office for public inspection during business hours.

Laws 1989, LB 502, § 2.